Illinois, session 104th, HB1410.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Taxpayers' Fiscal Charter Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Backlog payment cycle" means the time between a 8submission of a proper bill or invoice to the State 9Comptroller for payment and the issuing of that payment.10    "Discretionary spending" means any spending not mandated 11by federal or State law or court order.12    "Unfunded mandate" means a law requiring a unit of local 13government or school district to expend money without 14accompanying money from the State. 15    Section 10. Discretionary spending freeze.16    (a) The General Assembly shall freeze all discretionary 17spending during fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The General 18Assembly shall not expand any existing programs or create new 19programs requiring the expenditure of additional money.20    (b) Beginning in fiscal year 2028, the General Assembly 21may create new programs or expand existing programs requiring 22the expenditure of additional money only if the State's   HB1410- 2 -LRB104 07619 HLH 17663 b1backlog payment cycle is 30 days or less and the State has made 2its full pension payment for the fiscal year, as actuarially 3determined. 4    Section 15. Pay as you go. If the provisions of Section 10 5of this Act are satisfied, any new spending proposed by the 6General Assembly in addition to existing obligations shall be 7accompanied by a proposed source of revenue to pay for the 8proposed spending or specified cuts necessary to offset the 9proposed spending. 10    Section 20. Unfunded mandates; prohibition. 11Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, 12the State shall not impose any unfunded mandates on a school 13district or other unit of local government. No school district 14or other unit of local government shall be required to comply 15with an unfunded mandate until the mandate is no longer 16unfunded. 17    Section 25. Appropriations requirements.18    (a) Before the General Assembly passes and the Governor 19signs any appropriations law, the State Comptroller shall 20publish the State's estimated income, balance sheet, cash 21flow, and surplus or deficit.22    (b) No appropriations bill shall be voted on for third 23reading unless the bill, as amended, has been available for 72   HB1410- 3 -LRB104 07619 HLH 17663 b1hours on the General Assembly's website. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.